src/fst/stems/interrogatives.lexc
LEXICON Interrogatives
 ano # ;       ! what
 alin # ;      ! which
 kailan # ;    ! when
 bakit # ;     ! why
 sino # ;      ! whom, which person
 !na kanino # ; ! with whom, in whose possession, at whose place
 saan # ;      ! where, which place(s), what
 nasaan # ;    ! where <be>, which place(s) <be>
 paano # ;     ! how (manner/means)
 kumusta # ;   ! how <be> (condition/quality)
 gaano # ;     ! how (extent/degree/quantity)
 ilan # ;      ! how many
 magkano # ;   ! how much (price)
